District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

3-3203

Composition; term of office; quorum; vacancies; reimbursement of members’ expenses; meetings

Expired.

1981 Ed., §§ 2-2901 to 2-2908.

Prior Codifications

Expiration. Section 10(b) of D.C. Law 5-112, as amended by § 2(d) of D.C. Law 7-11, provided that the act shall expire 6 years after its effective date. D.C. Law 5-112 became effective on Sept. 26, 1984. Sections 2-2901 to 2-2908 §§ 3-3201 to 3-3208, 2001 Ed. expired Sept. 26, 1990.

Editor's Notes